Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2247, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Medical examination; costs. new text end new text begin Costs incurred by a county, city, or private hospital or other emergency medical facility or by a private physician for the examination of a victim of domestic assault by strangulation when the examination is performed for the purpose of gathering evidence are subject to the payment and reimbursement provisions in section 609.35. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end